Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 14.
LOCAL ACTS.

Local or special acts prohibited — Rights to repeal acts by
legislature.

The General Assembly shall not pass any local or special act. This amendment shall not prohibit the repeal of local or special acts.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition filed in the office of the Secretary of State on May 28, 1926 (see Acts 1927, p. 1215). It was approved at the general election on Oct. 5, 1926, by a vote of 80,500 for and 44,150 against.

This amendment may supersede Ark. Const., Art. 5, §§ 24-26.